Illinois, session 104th, SB2621.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much of 5those amounts as may be necessary, respectively, are 6appropriated to the Auditor General from the General Revenue 7Fund to meet the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 8Office of the Auditor General, as provided in the Illinois 9State Auditing Act: 10For Personal Services:11  For Regular Positions............................$8,000,00012  For State Contribution to Social Security..........$620,00013  Total............................................$8,620,000 14    Section 10. The sum of $35,592,488, or so much of that 15amount as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Auditor 16General from the Audit Expense Fund for administrative and 17operations expenses and audits, studies, investigations, and 18expenses related to actuarial services. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 202025.